Alaska, session 34, HB172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 33.30.061 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 06 (e) The commissioner may investigate and take action to reduce the cost of 07 housing prisoners by 08 (1) consolidating existing facilities; 09 (2) designating placement of a prisoner at an out-of-state facility. 10 (f) If a prisoner's remaining term of imprisonment exceeds seven years and the 11 commissioner designates placement at an out-of-state facility under (e) of this section, 12 the commissioner shall ensure the prisoner is housed exclusively apart from prisoners 13 who are not residents of this state. 14 (g) The department shall annually estimate the cost savings resulting from the 01 actions taken under (e) of this section and include the cost savings estimate as part of 02 the information compiled and submitted by the department under AS 37.07.050. The 03 legislature may appropriate an amount equal to the annual cost savings estimate for 04 education purposes. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.